Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Health Systems Division
- Administration ............... $ 190,641,550
(2) Health Systems Division
- Programs ........................ $ 4,005,387,706
(3) Health policy and
analytics............................ $ 97,244,108
(4) Public health..................... $ 211,592,268
(5) Oregon State Hospital ....... $ 746,162,547
(6) Central services ................ $ 94,128,960
(7) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 209,907,735
(8) Capital improvement......... $ 818,441
(9) Debt service ...................... $ 60,184,220
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco
tax receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected
or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Health Systems Division
- Administration ............... $ 33,447,861
(2) Health Systems Division
- Programs ........................ $ 4,228,602,303
(3) Health policy and
analytics............................ $ 110,282,544
(4) Behavioral health
workforce - ARPA ............. $ 60,000,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 1
(5) Public health..................... $ 311,765,916
(6) Drug treatment and
recovery services .............. $ 267,523,834
(7) Oregon State Hospital ....... $ 15,671,854
(8) Central services ................ $ 6,142,464
(9) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 37,307,402
(10) Shared administrative
services ............................. $ 234,006,965
(11) Capital improvement......... $ 818,441
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Health Systems Division
- Administration ............... $ 4,386,775
(2) Health Systems Division
- Programs ........................ $ 13,150,280
(3) Health policy and
analytics............................ $ 27,074
(4) Central services ................ $ 35,550
(5) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 730,264
(6) Debt service ...................... $ 3,976,940
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Veterans behavioral
health................................ $ 2,233,850
(2) Veterans dental
services ............................. $ 2,730,796
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2023
Act, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Health Systems Division
- Administration ............... $ 204,172,831
(2) Health Systems Division
- Programs ........................ $ 18,497,027,816
(3) Health policy and
analytics............................ $ 46,713,396
(4) Public health..................... $ 709,531,602
(5) Oregon State Hospital ....... $ 30,037,856
(6) Central services ................ $ 27,975,202
(7) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 66,311,309
SECTION 6. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, the following  expenditures by the
Oregon Health Authority are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Women, Infants and Children Program infant  formula rebate
system.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 2
(2) Expenditures from the federal funds  Women, Infants and Children Program food
voucher redemptions.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,488,161,194 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board from the Public Employees’
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,994,469,796 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 3